Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Chapter 12 Special Purpose Depository Institutions
§ 13-12-123.
Voluntary dissolution of special purpose depository institution; liquidation; reorganization; application for dissolution; filing fee; filing with the secretary of state; revocation of charter.

A special purpose depository institution may voluntarily dissolve in accordance with the provisions of this section. Voluntary dissolution shall be accomplished by either liquidating the special purpose depository institution or reorganizing the institution into an appropriate business entity that does not engage in any activity authorized only for a special purpose depository institution. Upon complete liquidation or completion of the reorganization, the commissioner shall revoke the charter of the special purpose depository institution and afterward, the company shall not use the word “special purpose depository institution” or “bank” in its business name or in connection with its ongoing business.

The special purpose depository institution may dissolve its charter either by liquidation or reorganization. The board of directors shall file an application for dissolution with the commissioner, accompanied by a filing fee established by rule of the commissioner. The application shall include a comprehensive plan for dissolution setting forth the proposed disposition of all assets and liabilities, in reasonable detail to effect a liquidation or reorganization, and any other plans required by the commissioner. The plan of dissolution shall provide for the discharge or assumption of all of the known and unknown claims and liabilities of the special purpose depository institution. Additionally, the application for dissolution shall include other evidence, certifications, affidavits, documents or information as the commissioner may require, including demonstration of how assets and liabilities will be disposed, the timetable for effecting disposition of the assets and liabilities and a proposal of the special purpose depository institution for addressing any claims that are asserted after dissolution has been completed. The commissioner shall examine the application for compliance with this section, the business entity laws applicable to the required type of dissolution and applicable rules. The commissioner may conduct a special examination of the special purpose depository institution, consistent with W.S. 13-12-119(c), for purposes of evaluating the application.

If the commissioner finds that the application is incomplete, the commissioner shall return it for completion not later than sixty (60) days after it is filed. If the application is found to be complete by the commissioner, the commissioner shall approve or disapprove the application not later than thirty (30) days after it is filed. If the commissioner approves the application, the special purpose depository institution may proceed with the dissolution pursuant to the plan outlined in the application, subject to any further conditions the commissioner may prescribe. If the special purpose depository institution subsequently determines that the plan of dissolution needs to be amended to complete the dissolution, it shall file an amended plan with the commissioner and obtain approval to proceed under the amended plan. If the commissioner does not approve the application or amended plan, the special purpose depository institution may appeal the decision to the board pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

Upon completion of all actions required under the plan of dissolution and satisfaction of all conditions prescribed by the commissioner, the special purpose depository institution shall submit a written report of its actions to the commissioner. The report shall contain a certification made under oath that the report is true and correct. Following receipt of the report, the commissioner, no later than sixty (60) days after the filing of the report, shall examine the special purpose depository institution to determine whether the commissioner is satisfied that all required actions have been taken in accordance with the plan of dissolution and any conditions prescribed by the commissioner. If all requirements and conditions have been met, the commissioner shall, within thirty (30) days of the examination, notify the special purpose depository institution in writing that the dissolution has been completed and issue a certificate of dissolution.

Upon receiving a certificate of dissolution, the special purpose depository institution shall surrender its charter to the commissioner. The special purpose depository institution shall then file articles of dissolution and other documents required by W.S.

17-16-1401

through

17-16-1440

for a corporation with the secretary of state. In the case of reorganization, the special purpose depository institution shall file the documents required by the secretary of state to finalize the reorganization.

If the commissioner determines that all required actions under the plan for dissolution, or as otherwise required by the commissioner, have not been completed, the commissioner shall notify the special purpose depository institution, not later than thirty (30) days after this determination, in writing what additional actions shall be taken in order for the institution to be eligible for a certificate of dissolution. The commissioner shall establish a reasonable deadline for the submission of evidence that additional actions have been taken and the commissioner may extend any deadline upon good cause. If the special purpose depository institution fails to file a supplemental report showing that the additional actions have been taken before the deadline, or submits a report that is found not to be satisfactory by the commissioner, the commissioner shall notify the special purpose depository institution in writing that its voluntary dissolution is not approved, and the institution may appeal the decision to the board pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

2019 ch. 92, § 2, effective October 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 92, § 6, makes the act effective October 1, 2019.

§ 13-12-124.
Failure to submit required report; fees; rules.

If a special purpose depository institution fails to submit any report required by this chapter or by rule within the prescribed period, the commissioner may impose and collect a fee for each day the report is overdue, as established by rule.

History.

2019 ch. 92, § 2, effective October 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 92, § 6, makes the act effective October 1, 2019.

§ 13-12-125.
Willful failure to perform duties imposed by law; removal.

Each officer, director, employee or agent of a special purpose depository institution, following written notice from the commissioner, is subject to removal upon order of the commissioner if he knowingly or willfully fails to:

Perform any duty required by this act or other applicable law; or

Conform to any rule or order of the commissioner.

History.

2019 ch. 92, § 2, effective October 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 92, § 6, makes the act effective October 1, 2019.

§ 13-12-126.
Rules.

The commissioner shall adopt all rules necessary to implement this chapter, consistent with W.S.

13-12-107

.

History.

2019 ch. 92, § 2, effective October 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 92, § 6, makes the act effective October 1, 2019.